Wyoming, session 2025, HB0191.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-7-1002(a)(xiv), (xxvii)(intro),
(E)(intro) and (I), 35-7-1031(a)(ii), (c)(intro),
(i)(intro), (A) through (D), by creating new subparagraphs
(G) and (H), (iii) and by creating a new paragraph (vi),
HB0191

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0560
35-7-1037, 35-7-1038(b), 35-7-1039 and 35-7-1040 are
amended to read:

35-7-1002. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(xiv) "Marihuana" or "marijuana" means all parts
of the plant of the genus Cannabis, whether growing or not;
the seed thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the
plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative,
mixture or preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin.
"Marihuana" or "marijuana" includes products that are
composed of both marijuana and other ingredients and that
are intended for use or consumption, including edible
products, ointments and tinctures. It does not include the
mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks,
oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other
compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or
preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin
extracted therefrom), fiber, oil or cake, or the sterilized
seed of the plant which is incapable of germination;

HB0191

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0560
(xxvii) "Drug paraphernalia" means all
equipment, products and materials of any kind when used,
advertised for use, intended for use or designed for use
for manufacturing, converting, preparing, packaging,
repackaging, storing, containing, concealing, injecting,
ingesting, inhaling or otherwise introducing into the human
body a controlled substance, except marijuana, in violation
of this act and includes:

(E) The following objects when used,
advertised for use, intended for use or designed for use in
ingesting, inhaling or otherwise introducing marihuana,
cocaine, hashish or hashish oil or any other controlled
substance, except marijuana, into the human body:

(I) Metal, acrylic, glass, stone,
plastic or ceramic pipes with or without screens, permanent
screens, hashish heads or punctured metal bowls;

35-7-1031. Unlawful manufacture or delivery;
counterfeit substance; unlawful possession; civil penalty
for marijuana.

HB0191

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0560
(a) Except as authorized by this act, it is unlawful
for any person to manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to manufacture or deliver, a controlled substance.
Any person who violates this subsection with respect to:

(ii) Any other controlled substance classified
in Schedule I, except marijuana in amounts specified in
paragraph (c)(vi) of this section, II or III, is guilty of
a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more
than ten (10) years, fined not more than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000.00), or both;

(c) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or
intentionally to possess a controlled substance unless the
substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to a
valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting
in the course of his professional practice, or except as
otherwise authorized by this act. With the exception of any
drug that has received final approval from the United
States food and drug administration, including dronabinol
as listed in W.S. 35-7-1018(h), and notwithstanding any
other provision of this act, no practitioner shall dispense
or prescribe marihuana, tetrahydrocannabinol, or synthetic
HB0191

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0560
equivalents of marihuana or tetrahydrocannabinol. No
prescription or practitioner's order for marihuana,
tetrahydrocannabinol, or synthetic equivalents of marihuana
or tetrahydrocannabinol shall be valid, unless the
prescription is for a drug that has received final approval
from the United States food and drug administration,
including dronabinol. Any person who violates this
subsection:

(i) And has in his possession a controlled
substance in the amount amounts set forth in this paragraph
is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for
not more than twelve (12) months, a fine of not more than
one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both. Any person
convicted for a third or subsequent offense under this
paragraph, other than a marijuana offense, including
convictions for violations of similar laws in other
jurisdictions, shall be imprisoned for a term not more than
five (5) years, fined not more than five thousand dollars
($5,000.00), or both. For purposes of this paragraph, the
amounts of a controlled substance are as follows:

HB0191

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0560
(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (G)
of this paragraph, for a controlled substance in plant
form, no more than three (3) ounces;

(B) Except as provided in subparagraph (H)
of this paragraph, for a controlled substance in liquid
form, no more than three-tenths (3/10) of a gram;

(C) Except as provided in subparagraph (H)
of this paragraph, for a controlled substance in powder or
crystalline form, no more than three (3) grams;

(D) Except as provided in subparagraph (H)
of this paragraph, for a controlled substance in pill or
capsule form, no more than three (3) grams;

(G) For marijuana in plant form, more than
three (3) ounces;

(H) For products composed of marijuana that
are:

HB0191

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0560
(I) In solid form, including edible
products, ointments and tinctures, more than sixteen (16)
ounces;

(II) In liquid form, more than
seventy-two (72) ounces;

(III) In a form that has undergone a
process to concentrate one (1) or more active cannabinoids
to increase the marijuana's potency, including in powder,
crystalline, pill or capsule form, more than thirty (30)
grams.

(iii) And has in his possession any other
controlled substance classified in Schedule I, except
marijuana, II or III in an amount greater than set forth in
paragraph (c)(i) of this section, is guilty of a felony
punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5)
years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars
($10,000.00), or both;

(vi) And has in his possession marijuana in any
combination of forms and amounts set forth in this
HB0191

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0560
paragraph shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more
than one hundred dollars ($100.00). For purposes of this
paragraph, the amounts of marijuana are as follows:

(A) For marijuana in plant form, three (3)
ounces or less;

(B) For products composed of marijuana that
are:

(I) In solid form, including edible
products, ointments and tinctures, sixteen (16) ounces or
less;

(II) In liquid form, seventy-two (72)
ounces or less;

(III) In a form that has undergone a
process to concentrate one (1) or more active cannabinoids
to increase the marijuana's potency, including in powder,
crystalline, pill or capsule form, thirty (30) grams or
less.

HB0191

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0560
35-7-1037. Probation and discharge of first
offenders.

Whenever any person who has not previously been convicted
of any offense under this act or under any statute of the
United States or of any state relating to narcotic drugs,
marihuana marijuana, or stimulant, depressant, or
hallucinogenic drugs, pleads guilty to or is found guilty
of possession of a controlled substance under W.S.
35-7-1031(c) 35-7-1031(c)(i) through (v) or
35-7-1033(a)(iii)(B), or pleads guilty to or is found
guilty of using or being under the influence of a
controlled substance under W.S. 35-7-1039, the court,
without entering a judgment of guilt and with the consent
of the accused, may defer further proceedings and place him
on probation upon terms and conditions. Any term of
probation imposed under this section for a felony offense
shall not exceed the maximum term of probation authorized
under W.S. 7-13-302(b). Upon violation of a term or
condition, the court may enter an adjudication of guilt and
proceed as otherwise provided. Upon fulfillment of the
terms and conditions, the court shall discharge the person
and dismiss the proceedings against him. Discharge and
HB0191

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0560
dismissal under this section shall be without adjudication
of guilt and is not a conviction for purposes of this
section or for purposes of disqualifications or
disabilities imposed by law upon conviction of a crime,
including the additional penalties imposed for second or
subsequent convictions under W.S. 35-7-1038. There may be
only one (1) discharge and dismissal under this section
with respect to any person. This section shall not be
construed to provide an exclusive procedure. Any other
procedure provided by law relating to suspension of trial
or probation, may be followed, in the discretion of the
trial court.

35-7-1038. Second or subsequent offenses; mandatory
minimum penalty for certain subsequent offenses.

(b) For purposes of subsection (a) of this section,
an offense is a second or subsequent offense if, prior to
his conviction of the offense, the offender has at any time
been convicted under this act or under any statute of the
United States or of any state relating to narcotic drugs,
marijuana, depressant, stimulant or hallucinogenic drugs,
HB0191

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0560
excluding any conviction related to the possession or use
of marijuana by the offender.

35-7-1039. Person using or under influence of
controlled substance.

Any person who knowingly or intentionally uses or is under
the influence of a controlled substance listed in Schedules
I, except marijuana, II or III and except when administered
or prescribed by or under the direction of a licensed
practitioner, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be
punished by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed
six (6) months or a fine not to exceed seven hundred fifty
dollars ($750.00), or by both.

35-7-1040. Planting, cultivating or processing peyote
or opium poppy.

Any person who knowingly or intentionally plants,
cultivates, harvests, dries, or processes marijuana in
amounts that exceed the amounts listed in W.S.
35-7-1031(c)(vi) or any marihuana, peyote, or opium poppy
except as otherwise provided by law shall be guilty of a
HB0191

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0560
misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment not to
exceed six (6) months in the county jail or by a fine not
to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

Section 2. W.S. 35-7-1002(a)(xxvii)(C) is repealed.

Section 3. The attorney general, as commissioner of
drugs and substances control, shall adopt rules necessary
to implement this act not later than July 1, 2025.

Section 4.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(b) Sections 1 and 2 of this act are effective July
1, 2025.

(END)
HB0191